Hawaii statutes.
§707-703 Negligent homicide in the second
degree. (1) A person commits the offense of negligent homicide in the
second degree if that person causes the death of:

(a) Another person by the operation of a vehicle in
a negligent manner; or

(b) A vulnerable user by the operation of a vehicle
in a manner that constitutes simple negligence as defined in section
707-704(2).

(2) Negligent homicide in the second degree is
a class C felony. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 292, §2; am L 2012, c
316, §3]

Case Notes

Section does not preclude charging defendant on one count for
each victim injured fatally. 62 H. 389, 615 P.2d 748 (1980).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next